Utah statutes.
63M-1-3203.   STEM Action Center Board -- Duties.

(1)  The board shall:

(a)  establish a STEM Action Center program to:

(i)  coordinate STEM activities in the state among the following stakeholders:

(A)  the State Board of Education;

(B)  school districts and charter schools;

(C)  the State Board of Regents;

(D)  institutions of higher education;

(E)  parents of home-schooled students; and

(F)  other state agencies;

(ii)  align public education STEM activities with higher education STEM activities; and

(iii)  create and coordinate best practices among public education and higher education;

(b)  with the consent of the Senate, appoint an executive director to oversee the administration of the STEM Action Center;

(c)  select a physical location for the STEM Action Center;

(d)  strategically engage industry and business entities to cooperate with the board:

(i)  to support professional development and provide other assistance for educators and students; and

(ii)  to provide private funding and support for the STEM Action Center;

(e)  give direction to the STEM Action Center and the providers selected through a request for proposals process pursuant to this part; and

(f)  work to meet the following expectations:

(i)  that at least 50 educators are implementing best practice learning tools in classrooms per each product specialist or manager working with the STEM Action Center;

(ii)  performance change in student achievement in each classroom working with a STEM Action Center product specialist or manager; and

(iii)  that students from at least 50 high schools participate in the STEM competitions, fairs, and camps described in Subsection 63M-1-3204(2)(d).

(2)  The board may:

(a)  enter into contracts for the purposes of this part;

(b)  apply for, receive, and disburse funds, contributions, or grants from any source for the purposes set forth in this part;

(c)  employ, compensate, and prescribe the duties and powers of individuals necessary to execute the duties and powers of the board;

(d)  prescribe the duties and powers of the STEM Action Center providers; and

(e)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules to administer this part.



Enacted by Chapter 336, 2013 General Session

